Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3326
Director; require additional reports.

In addition to an annual statement, the director may require of licensees, under oath and in the form prescribed by him or her, such additional regular or special reports as he or she may deem necessary to the proper supervision of corporations under sections 44-3312 and 44-3313.

Laws 1979, LB 52, § 26.